Utah statutes.
64-13-26.   Private providers of services.
(1)  The department may contract with private providers or other agencies for
the provision of care, treatment, and supervision of offenders committed to
the care and custody of the department.
(2) (a)  The department shall:
(i)  establish standards for the operation of the programs; and
(ii)  annually review the programs for compliance.
(b)  The reviews shall be classified as confidential internal working papers.
(c)  Access to records regarding the reviews is available upon the discretion
of the executive director or the governor, or upon court order.
